Hawaii statutes.
[§115-10 Duty to maintain access within
beach transit corridors; remedies.] (a) The department of land and
natural resources shall maintain access within beach transit corridors under
this chapter and chapter 183C, by requiring private property owners to ensure
that beach transit corridors abutting their lands shall be kept passable and
free from the landowner's human-induced, enhanced, or unmaintained vegetation
that interferes or encroaches in the beach transit corridors.

(b) In addition to the criminal penalties in
section 115-9, the department is authorized to issue notice to landowners who
fail to maintain access within beach transit corridors, as set out in
subsection (a), abutting their property. If any landowner fails to remove the
landowner's human-induced, enhanced, or unmaintained vegetation within
twenty-one days of notice being issued, the department shall take any action
authorized under section 183C-7 as necessary to maintain access within beach
transit corridors; provided that if the landowner contests the basis upon which
the notice was issued prior to the expiration of the notice period, the
department's enforcement actions under section 183C-7 shall be tolled until the
final resolution of the contested matter.

(c) As used in this section, "landowner"
means the record owner of the property or the record owner's agent, including a
lessee, tenant, property manager, or trustee. [L 2010, c 160, §2]

Note

Repeal of section on June 30, 2013 by L 2010, c 160, §7
deleted by L 2013, c 120, §4.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next